Utah statutes.
13-11-17.5.   Costs and attorney's fees.

Any judgment granted in favor of the enforcing authority in connection with the enforcement of this chapter shall include, in addition to any other monetary award or injunctive relief, an award of reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and costs of investigation.



Enacted by Chapter 105, 1987 General Session

